Washington statutes.
RCW 31.24.150

Dissolution—Method—Distribution of assets.

A business development company, upon the affirmative vote of two-thirds of the votes of the stockholders entitled to vote their shares, shall dissolve the business development company as provided by Title 23B RCW, to the extent that Title 23B RCW is not in conflict with this chapter. Upon dissolution of the business development company, none of the business development company's assets shall be distributed to the stockholders until all sums due the creditors thereof have been paid in full.

[ 2006 c 87 s 18; 1991 c 72 s 50; 1983 c 3 s 52; 1963 c 162 s 15.]